Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that government should prioritize funding for safe streets, excellent schools, protection of the most vulnerable, and reliable, high quality infrastructure, while allowing individuals, families, and businesses to thrive. This is only possible when the tax burden placed upon the people is limited to what is necessary to fund essential needs and services, ensuring that the state remains economically competitive and a desirable place to live, work, and raise a family.If the office of equity has strong public support, it could be reconstituted to operate as a nonprofit organization but will no longer be serviced at taxpayer expense.The legislature intends to save the taxpayers $19,500,000 by eliminating the office of equity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.06D.010 (Definitions) and 2020 c 332 s 2;(2) RCW 43.06D.020 (Office establishedâPurpose) and 2020 c 332 s 3;(3) RCW 43.06D.030 (Appointment of directorâDutiesâOther employees) and 2020 c 332 s 4;(4) RCW 43.06D.040 (DutiesâReports) and 2020 c 332 s 5;(5) RCW 43.06D.050 (Authority) and 2020 c 332 s 8;(6) RCW 43.06D.060 (Washington state patrol diversity, equity, and inclusion strategic recruitment and retention planâOversight) and 2022 c 146 s 2;(7) RCW 43.06D.900 (FindingsâIntentâ2020 c 332) and 2020 c 332 s 1; and(8) RCW 43.06D.901 (Constructionâ2020 c 332) and 2020 c 332 s 9.--- END ---